Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [360.027] DETAINED INDIVIDUALS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Airline company" has the meaning given in section 360.511, subdivision 20. new text end new text begin (c) "Detained individual" means an aircraft passenger who is traveling involuntarily or being held in any kind of restraint other than a seat belt. new text end new text begin (d) "Fixed base operator" means a firm, partnership, company, corporation, association, or other similar commercial entity that engages in commercial operations, including but not limited to fueling or providing aircraft parking services, at an airport. new text end new text begin (e) "Passenger form" means a form under this section for collecting and relaying information on a detained individual. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Passenger form. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of corrections, must develop a passenger form to collect information on a detained individual. At a minimum, the passenger form must include: new text end new text begin (1) the name, date of birth, and address of the individual; new text end new text begin (2) the individual's medical history, including allergies, other existing medical conditions, and current medications; new text end new text begin (3) the name and contact information for the individual's spouse, next of kin, or other primary contact; new text end new text begin (4) the individual's legal circumstances, including: new text end new text begin (i) the name and contact information for the individual's attorney; and new text end new text begin (ii) identification of any pending legal proceedings; new text end new text begin (5) identification of whether the individual is a minor, and if the individual is a minor and a parent or guardian is not on board the aircraft, the name and contact information of a parent or guardian; new text end new text begin (6) a statement that the form will be reviewed by a fixed base operator and shared with emergency responders in the event of an emergency; new text end new text begin (7) a statement that completion of any portion of the form under clauses (1) to (3) is voluntary; and new text end new text begin (8) a space for the individual to affirmatively indicate that the individual has been provided and has chosen not to fill out the form. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must make the passenger form available in the most commonly spoken non-English languages in the state and in any area in which the commissioner identifies regular transport of detained individuals. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Form collection and use. new text end new text begin (a) The pilot or person in command of the detention must ensure that each detained individual on board the aircraft is able to complete a passenger form and must maintain the form in the aircraft while the detained individual is on board. When a detained individual departs the aircraft, the pilot or person in command may provide the form to another entity with authority over custody of the individual or may otherwise dispose of the form. new text end new text begin (b) Before providing commercial operations service to an aircraft, a fixed base operator must confirm that a passenger form is maintained for each detained individual on board an aircraft. new text end new text begin (c) In an emergency involving a detained individual, aircraft crew must provide the individual's passenger form to emergency responders or hospitals. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Refueling. new text end new text begin (a) A person must not refuel an aircraft if an individual on board the aircraft is in any kind of restraint other than a seat belt. new text end new text begin (b) A detained individual who is removed from an aircraft for refueling must be: new text end new text begin (1) placed in a climate-controlled enclosure; and new text end new text begin (2) provided with regular access to a restroom and water. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Documentation. new text end new text begin (a) A fixed base operator must: new text end new text begin (1) maintain documentation on each aircraft used to transport one or more detained individuals, including: new text end new text begin (i) identification of the firm or organization providing air flight services and the specific governmental agency performing the detention; new text end new text begin (ii) a copy of the confirmation under subdivision 3, paragraph (b), including but not limited to the number of detained individuals on board the aircraft; new text end new text begin (iii) a review of compliance with the refueling requirements under subdivision 4; and new text end new text begin (iv) the signature of a member of the aircraft crew; and new text end new text begin (2) submit a monthly report to the commissioner that contains the documentation required under clause (1), in the manner specified by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) A fixed base operator must retain the documentation required under paragraph (a), clause (1), for at least two years. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Contract limitations. new text end new text begin (a) The state, a political subdivision, or a person must not enter into an agreement with an airline company that transports a detained individual unless the airline provides evidence of: new text end new text begin (1) a warrant issued by a federal court or state court; new text end new text begin (2) a court order; or new text end new text begin (3) an authorization issued by the governor for extradition of the specific detained individual to another state. new text end new text begin (b) The requirements under paragraph (a) do not apply to an agreement entered into on or before October 1, 2026. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective October 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.608, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5a. new text end new text begin Contract limitations. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision, the terms defined in section 360.027, subdivision 1, have the same meanings. new text end new text begin (b) The commission must not enter into an agreement with a fixed base operator that provides services to an airline company that transports a detained individual unless the airline provides evidence of: new text end new text begin (1) a warrant issued by a federal court or state court; new text end new text begin (2) a court order; or new text end new text begin (3) an authorization issued by the governor for extradition of the specific detained individual to another state. new text end new text begin (c) The requirements under paragraph (b) do not apply to an agreement entered into on or before October 1, 2026. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective October 1, 2026. new text end